Tennessee, session 114, SB2122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
The Tennessee K-12 nutrition task force is hereby established to evaluate the
prevalence of ultra-processed foods (UPFs) and other substances in public school meal
programs and the impact of UPFs on student health.
SECTION 2.
(a) The task force shall consist of nine (9) members, appointed as follows:
(1) Two (2) members appointed by the chair of the senate health and
welfare committee;
(2) Two (2) members appointed by the chair of the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over health matters;
(3) Two (2) members appointed by the chair of the senate education
committee;
(4) Two (2) members appointed by the chair of the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over grade kindergarten through
twelve (K-12) matters; and
(5) One (1) member representing the Tennessee department of
education, appointed by the commissioner of education.
(b) A member of the task force must not have a financial interest in, or a conflict
of interest with, any food, beverage, or pharmaceutical manufacturing company.
SB2122
011918
- 1 -

(c) The member appointed pursuant to subdivision (a)(5) shall call the first
meeting of the task force.
(d) At its first meeting, the task force shall elect a chair and vice chair from
among the appointed members.
(e) A majority of the members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(f) The members of the task force receive no compensation for their service on
the task force, nor are the members entitled to per diem or travel expenses for the
purposes of carrying out their duties under this act.
(g) A member of the task force shall serve until the task force completes its
business and ceases to exist pursuant to Section 5. If a member of the task force is
unable to continue to serve, then the authority that appointed the member shall appoint a
replacement.
SECTION 3.
The task force shall:
(1) Identify the percentage of UPFs, artificial dyes, and chemical
additives currently included in K-12 school breakfasts and lunches;
(2) Review clinical data regarding the link between UPF consumption in
schools and rising rates of childhood obesity and metabolic dysfunction; and
(3) Develop actionable recommendations to transition school menus
toward whole-food alternatives.
SECTION 4.
No later than December 1, 2026, the task force shall submit a final report of its
findings and legislative recommendations to the governor and the legislative librarian, in
order to ensure consideration prior to the 2027 legislative session.
- 2 - 011918

SECTION 5.
The Tennessee K-12 nutrition task force ceases to exist on January 31, 2027.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011918